Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law

§ 81-12-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Savings Association Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings, except to the extent that any such word or phrase specifically is qualified by its context:

“Association” means a savings association or savings and loan association subject to provisions of this chapter.

“Board” means the State Board of Banking Review.

“Capital stock association” means an association organized pursuant to Sections 81-12-37 and 81-12-39.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance.

“Community” means a centralized area or locality in which the inhabitants have common residential, social or business interests. The term is not restricted to a municipal corporation or other political subdivision; a community need not be limited by lines and boundaries. A city, town or other governmental unit, either incorporated or unincorporated, may constitute one (1) community; a large, populous area under one or more forms of government may comprise one (1) or several communities.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.

“Earnings” means that part of the “sources available for payment of earnings” as defined herein which is declared payable on savings accounts from time to time by the board of directors. Earnings also may be referred to as “interest.”

“Financial institution” means a thrift institution, commercial bank or trust company.

“Impaired condition” means a condition in which the assets of an association in the aggregate do not have a fair value equal to the aggregate amount of liabilities of the association to its creditors, including its members and all other persons, or a condition in which the association shall be unable to pay when due current withdrawal requests by its members or depositors.

“Insured association” means an association, the savings accounts of which are insured wholly or in part in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

“Liquid assets” means cash on hand, cash on deposit in federal home loan banks, in state banks performing similar reserve functions, or in commercial banks insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, which is not pledged as security for indebtedness; except that any deposits in a bank under the control or in the possession of any supervisory authority shall not be considered as liquid assets; loans immediately available or federal funds on a day-to-day basis to a bank insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; and direct obligations of, or obligations which are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by, the United States or agencies or instrumentalities thereof or this state.

“Member” means a person holding a savings account of a mutual association, and a person borrowing from or assuming or obligated upon a loan or interest therein held by an association, or purchasing property securing a loan or interest therein held by an association, and any other person obligated to an association. A joint and survivorship relationship, whether of savers or borrowers, constitutes a single membership. This definition shall not apply to associations organized under Sections 81-12-37 and 81-12-39 as a capital stock association.

“Mutual association” means an association composed of members which is not a capital stock association as authorized by this chapter.

“Net income” means gross revenues for an accounting period less all expenses paid or incurred, taxes and losses sustained as shall not have been charged to reserves pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Net worth” means the sum of all reserve accounts (except specific or valuation reserves), retained earnings, capital stock, any other nonwithdrawable accounts of an association, and the principal amount of any subordinated debt securities to the extent authorized by the commissioner.

“One borrower” means: (i) any person or entity which is or which, upon the making of a loan, will become obligor on a real estate loan; (ii) nominees of such obligor; (iii) all persons, trusts, partnerships, syndicates and corporations of which such obligor is a nominee or a beneficiary, partner, member or record or beneficial stockholder owning ten percent (10%) or more of the capital stock; and (iv) if such obligor is a trust, partnership, syndicate or corporation, all trusts, partnerships, syndicates and corporations of which any beneficiary, partner, member or record or beneficial stockholder owning ten percent (10%) or more of the capital stock, is also a beneficiary, partner, member or record or beneficial stockholder owning ten percent (10%) or more of the capital stock of such obligor. A guarantor or endorser shall be considered an obligor.

“Person” means any natural or artificial being, including any legal entity.

“Primary lending area” means this state and any county (or parish) of another state of which the county seat is located not more than seventy-five (75) air miles from the home or a branch office of an association.

“Real estate loan” means any loan or other obligation secured by a first lien on real estate in any state held in fee or in a leasehold or subleasehold extending or renewable automatically or at the option of the holder (or at the option of the association) for a period of at least ten (10) years beyond the maturity or date scheduled for a final principal payment of such loan or obligation, or any transaction out of which a first lien or claim is created against such real estate, including, inter alia, the purchase of such real estate in fee by an association and the concurrent or immediate sale thereof on installment contract.

“Savings account” means that part of the savings liability of the association which is credited to the account of the holder thereof. A savings account also may be referred to as a deposit.

“Savings institution” means either an association or a savings bank.

“Savings liability” means the aggregate amount of savings accounts of members and depositors, including earnings credited to such accounts, less redemptions and withdrawals.

“Service organization” means an organization, substantially all the activities of which consist of originating, purchasing, selling and servicing loans upon real estate and participating interests therein, or clerical, bookkeeping, accounting, statistical or similar functions performed primarily for associations, and such other activities as the commissioner, by regulation, may approve, which are directly related to real estate development and the servicing of real estate loans.

“Sources available for payment of earnings” means net income for an accounting period less amounts transferred to reserves as provided in or permitted by this chapter, plus any balance of undivided profits from preceding accounting periods, or from surplus.

“Thrift institution” means a savings bank, bank for savings, a homestead association, a savings and loan association, a building and loan association, a federal savings association, a federal savings and loan association, and a supervised thrift and residential financing institution of a substantially similar nature, but shall not include a banking association organized under the laws of the United States or a bank organized under the laws of this state or any other state.

“Withdrawal value” means the amount credited to a savings account of a member, less lawful deductions therefrom, as contained in the records of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 2; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 106; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-4.
Private corporation laws; application to savings and loan associations.

All the provisions of law relating to private corporations operating in this state which are not inconsistent with this chapter, or with the proper business of depository institutions, shall be applicable to all savings and loan associations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 392, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994, ch. 622, § 162, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1977, ch. 445; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 29; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 3; 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 107; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 3]

§ 81-12-6.
Department of Savings Institutions and Savings Institution Board abolished; transfer of powers, duties, etc. to other agencies.

The Department of Savings Institutions and the Savings Institution Board are abolished, and all of the powers, duties, property, contractual rights and obligations and unexpended funds of that department and board shall be transferred to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance and State Board of Banking Review as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-7.
Rights, powers, privileges and duties of board.

The commissioner shall have such rights, powers and privileges and shall be subject to such duties as are provided by this chapter, and shall make such other provisions for the orderly conduct of the business of the department under this chapter as he deems necessary. The commissioner shall have the authority and duty to make, after notice and hearing, such reasonable rules, regulations and orders as required by this chapter and as may be necessary from time to time to administer and enforce this chapter. The commissioner shall give at least thirty (30) days’ notice of any proposed rule or regulation by publication not less than one (1) time in a newspaper having statewide circulation and, in addition, shall give such notice of the proposed rule or regulation by United States mail, postage prepaid, to each thrift institution in this state and to such others as he deems necessary or advisable and shall file such notice in his office. Any savings institution may propose rules or regulations for consideration by the commissioner. The commissioner shall maintain in his office permanent records of his hearings and decisions. Notice of the adoption of any rule or regulation shall be sent by United States mail, postage prepaid, to each thrift institution within ten (10) days of its adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 3 (4); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 4; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 108; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-9.
Determinations of commissioner final; judicial review.

The determination by the commissioner upon any matter decided by him shall be final, subject to review by the courts as provided herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 3 (5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-11.
Duties of department.

The department is charged with the execution of all laws relating to institutions carrying on a savings and loan business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (1, 2); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 536, § 7; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 109; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§§ 81-12-13 and 81-12-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 162, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§81-12-13. [Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (3, 4); 1982, chs. 301, § 7, 331, § 1; 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 7; 1992, ch. 489, § 110; 1993, ch. 441, § 7]

§81-12-15. [Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (5); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 8; 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 8; 1992, ch. 489, § 111; 1993, ch. 441, § 8]

§ 81-12-17.
Interests in savings institutions prohibited; confidentiality of information.

The commissioner, deputy commissioner and examiners shall not be interested in a savings institution, directly or indirectly, either as creditor (except that each may be a savings account holder and receive earnings thereon), director, officer, employee, borrower (except that each may be a borrower as to a single home in which he actually resides or has resided), trustee or attorney, nor shall any one (1) of them receive, directly or indirectly, any payment, compensation or gratuity from any savings institution.

The commissioner, examiners, all employees of the department and members of the board shall not divulge any information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties as prescribed by this chapter, except insofar as the same may be rendered necessary by law or under order of court; however, the commissioner may furnish information as to the condition of any savings institution to the appropriate federal regulatory authority, any federal home loan bank, the board, or the board of directors of the affected savings institution, and the commissioner may provide to members of the public the information authorized under Section 81-12-178 without being in violation of this subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (6-8); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 9; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 112; reenacted and amended, 1993, ch. 441, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 162, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (9); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 10; 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 10; 1992, ch. 489, § 113; 1993, ch. 441, § 10]

§ 81-12-21.
Transfer of books and records; continuation of actions.

Within sixty (60) days after July 1, 1977, the funds, books, records, documents, equipment, and supplies of every such office and officer created or appointed by Chapter 11, Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be transferred, pursuant to orders of the Governor, to the office of the commissioner.

All actions or proceedings heretofore instituted by any officer or officers charged with the supervision of such associations other than actions or proceedings by the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91, shall be continued in the name of the commissioner in such manner as he may direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 4 (10,11); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 11; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-23.
Commissioner; supervisory and enforcement powers; approvals, orders and instructions.

The commissioner shall have general supervision over all associations and corporations which are subject to the provisions of this chapter. He shall enforce the provisions of this chapter by use of the powers herein conferred; and he is hereby vested with the authority to require such associations and corporations to correct violations of this chapter. Upon a finding that it is necessary and appropriate to further the objective of this chapter, the commissioner may order that improper entries found on the books and records of an association be corrected.

Every approval by the commissioner or the board given pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and every communication having the effect of an order or instruction to any association shall be in writing signed by the commissioner under seal and shall be sent by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the association affected thereby, addressed to the president thereof at the home office of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 5; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 12; 331, § 2; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 12; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 12; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-24.
Removal of officers and directors.

If, in the commissioner’s opinion, after an examination, audit, or investigation, it is determined that any director or officer or any employee or controlling stockholder of any association has knowingly participated in or consented to any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, or any repeated violation of or failure to comply with any association’s bylaws, and that as a result, a situation exists requiring immediate corrective action, the commissioner shall give notice to the board of directors of the association setting forth the violations and the remedies for same. Failure of the board of directors to comply with the requirements of the commissioner within ten (10) days from the date of the notice shall render the board of directors in default thereupon. Upon the expiration of such ten (10) days and upon continuation of such noncompliance and default, the commissioner may issue an order temporarily removing such person or persons cited for improper conduct as above described pending a hearing before the commissioner. In regard to a controlling stockholder, the commissioner may order the stockholder to place all his voting stock in a voting trust, the trustee of the voting trust to be designated by the commissioner. Any temporary order of removal shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Order of Removal” and shall be effective upon issuance for a period of thirty (30) days and may be extended once upon written notice by the commissioner for an additional period of fifteen (15) days. A hearing upon such “Temporary Order of Removal” shall be held by the commissioner within the thirty-day period, or any extension thereof, upon not less than fifteen (15) days’ notice to the removed person or persons by certified United States mail, restricted delivery, at which hearing the commissioner may dissolve the temporary order or make the same permanent. No removed person or persons shall receive any salary, compensation or remuneration from the association as an officer or director after the order is made permanent. Any temporary order of removal by the commissioner shall not be subject to judicial review in any form. Any final order of the commissioner may be appealed as provided in Section 81-12-205.

Any removal pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be effective in all respects as if such removal had been made by the board of directors or the shareholders of the association in question.

Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, no director or officer removed pursuant to this section shall be eligible to be elected or reelected to any position as an officer or director of that association nor shall such an officer or director be eligible to be elected to or retain a position as an officer or director of any other association or financial institution.

The commissioner may appoint a director or officer to fill any vacancy caused by a removal pursuant to this section, but such appointed director or officer, should such removal be permanent, shall be appointed only to serve the balance of the term of the vacant position. The commissioner may waive the requirements of Section 81-12-83(3) of a director appointed under the provisions of this section. Such director shall be eligible to be elected by the shareholders thereafter. Such officer shall be eligible to be elected by the board of directors of an association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 455; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 13; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 13; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-25.
Incorporation; petition; fee; articles; bylaws; exhibits.

Any five (5) or more individuals (hereinafter referred to as the “incorporators”), citizens of this state, may form a mutual association or capital stock association to promote thrift and home financing, subject to approval as hereinafter provided in this chapter, by filing with the commissioner, two (2) sworn duplicate originals of a petition for a certificate of incorporation in the form to be prescribed by the commissioner, accompanied by the proposed articles of incorporation and proposed bylaws, each in a form approved by the commissioner and accompanied by the incorporation fee. The proposed bylaws shall make provisions for (a) annual meeting of members or stockholders, (b) special meeting of members or stockholders, (c) notice of meeting of members or stockholders, (d) procedure for nomination of directors, (e) meetings of board of directors, (f) resignation and removal of directors, (g) officers, (h) execution of instruments, (i) evidence of savings accounts, (j) corporate seal, (k) fiscal year, (l) amendments and (m) such other matters as may be prescribed by the commissioner by rule or regulation. The petitioners shall submit with their petition statements, exhibits, maps and other data which the commissioner may require, which data shall be sufficiently detailed and comprehensive to enable the commissioner to pass upon the petition as to the criteria set out in Section 81-12-27.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 6 (1); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 13; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 14; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 14; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-27.
Incorporation; examination and investigation of petition.

Upon receipt of a petition for a certificate of incorporation, including supporting data, the commissioner shall promptly give consideration to the petition and make an examination of the proposed articles of incorporation to determine if they meet all requirements of law. The commissioner shall then make an investigation to determine that the prerequisites of this chapter have been complied with and that:

The character, responsibility and general fitness of the persons named in the petition are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the business of the proposed association will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this chapter, and that the proposed association will have qualified full-time management;

There is public need for the proposed association and the interest of the public will be best served by granting the petition;

The anticipated volume and type of business of the proposed association is such as to indicate profitable operation within a reasonable time; and

The operation of the proposed association will not unduly harm any properly conducted financial institution serving the needs and existing in the community in which the principal office or any branch of the proposed association is to be located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 6(2); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 14; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 15; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-29.
Incorporation; notice of petition; filing notice of opposition; hearing.

Upon receipt of a petition for a certificate of incorporation to form an association, the complete filing and filing date to be determined by the commissioner, the commissioner shall, within fifteen (15) days of the determined filing date, give written notice to all financial institutions in the county in which the proposed association is to be located and to all financial institutions in the counties bordering the county in which the proposed association is to be located. Notice shall also be sent to all interested persons and shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed association is to be located. Such notice shall include the subject matter of the petition and shall invite persons to be heard by the board by sworn written statement or in person. Any financial institution opposing approval of the petition of incorporation shall file a sworn written statement of such opposition with the commission er not later than the date fixed therefor by the commissioner in his notice. The statement of opposition shall set forth in summary form specific objections to the incorporation of the proposed association. The protestant shall, at the same time its statement of opposition is filed with the commissioner, furnish the petitioner a copy of such statement by first class United States mail. The protestant shall certify to the commissioner that he has furnished such statement to the petitioner.

Within forty-five (45) days of the determined filing date of a petition for a certificate of incorporation to form an association, the commissioner, in writing, shall set a date for the hearing of such petition by the board to consider the petition and his findings, such date to be not earlier than sixty (60) days and not more than ninety (90) days from the determined filing date of the petition. Written notice of such hearing date shall be furnished by first class United States mail to the board members, the petitioner, the petitioner’s attorney, and any protestants of record and their attorneys.

When the commissioner has completed the examination and made his investigation, he shall record his findings and recommendations in writing and present them to the board at least fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing date set pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Times established pursuant to this section may be extended by the commissioner upon good cause shown.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 6(3); Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 15; 331, § 3; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 16; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 16; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 48; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-31.
Incorporation; meeting of board to consider petition; cross-examination of and compelling attendance of witnesses; disposition of petition.

The board, at its meeting, shall consider the findings and recommendation of the commissioner and shall hear such oral testimony as he may wish to give or be called upon to give, and shall also receive information and hear testimony from the prospective incorporators of the proposed association and from any and all other interested persons bearing upon the approval of the petition and the operation of the new association. All witnesses shall be subject to cross-examination by any of the parties who are incorporators or objectors or by the board. After considering the findings, and recommendation submitted to it by the commissioner and his oral testimony, if any, and considering such other information and evidence, either written or oral, which has come before it, the board shall decide if it has before it sufficient information and evidence upon which it can dispose of the petition for a certificate of incorporation to form an association. If it is determined that evidence and information is not sufficient, then the board shall order the commissioner to secure such additional information and evidence as it may prescribe or shall request such from the prospective incorporators and from other interested persons. The board shall thereupon set a date for a future meeting to be held in not less than forty-five (45) nor more than sixty (60) days and shall give to the prospective incorporators, financial institutions and other interested persons the same notice of such meeting prescribed above and shall recess the meeting then being held until such future date. The board shall have and is hereby vested with the power to compel attendance of witnesses, just as is the commissioner, and all testimony given before said board shall be taken down and may be transcribed by a reporter at the request of any interested party. If the board, or a majority thereof, shall determine that it has before it sufficient evidence and information upon which to base a decision, then it shall render a written opinion and decision in the matter within sixty (60) days of the last meeting. If its decision is favorable, then the board shall issue a certificate of approval of incorporation of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 6(4); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 16; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 17; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 17; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-33.
Incorporation; proceedings upon approval of incorporation; commencement of corporate existence.

The commissioner shall file one (1) signed copy of such certificate of approval and of the certificate of incorporation with the Secretary of State. The commissioner shall endorse upon the two (2) copies of the petition for certificate of incorporation filed with him such certificate of approval and return the duplicate original and a copy of the certificate of incorporation to the association, addressed to the chairman of the incorporators, and shall retain the original petition for certificate of incorporation and a copy of the certificate of incorporation in the permanent files of his office. He shall return one (1) copy of the approved bylaws to the association, addressed to the chairman of the incorporators, and retain in the permanent files of his office the original signed copy of the approved bylaws. The petition for certificate of incorporation, the certificate of approval of incorporation, the certificate of incorporation, and the bylaws shall not be filed or recorded in any other state or county office. The failure of the commissioner to file, return or retain any such document as above provided shall not affect the validity of the incorporation of any association.

The corporate existence of an association shall begin on the date the commissioner issues the certificate of incorporation of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 6(5, 6); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 17; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 18; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 18; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-35.
Organization of mutual association; subscription by incorporators; bond; expense fund; organization meeting.

A mutual association shall be organized in accordance with this section. The incorporators shall appoint one (1) of their number as chairman of the incorporators. The incorporators, before a certificate of incorporation is issued, shall pay in cash to such chairman, as subscription to the savings accounts of any proposed association, including that part of the original subscription paid by such chairman, an aggregate amount, fixed as follows in relation to the population of the municipality in which the home office of the association is to be located: (a) in municipalities having not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) inhabitants, the minimum sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00); (b) in municipalities having more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), but not more than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants, the minimum sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); (c) in municipalities having one hundred thousand (100,000) or more inhabitant s, the minimum sum of One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00). The population of the municipality shall be determined by the commissioner based upon the latest federal decennial census.

The incorporators shall procure from a surety company or other surety acceptable to the commissioner, a surety bond in form approved by the commissioner in an amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the minimum original subscription required by paragraph (1). Such bond shall name the commissioner as obligee and shall be delivered to him. It shall assure the safekeeping of the funds subscribed and their delivery to the association after the issuance of the certificate of incorporation and after the bonding of the officers. In the event of the failure to complete organization, such bond shall assure the return of the amounts collected to the respective subscribers or their assigns, less reasonable expense which shall be deducted from the expense fund.

The incorporators, in addition to their subscriptions to savings accounts, shall create an expense fund in an amount not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the minimum amount of savings account subscriptions required to be paid in under this chapter, from which expense fund the expense of organizing the association and its operating expenses may be paid until such time as its net income is sufficient to pay such earnings as may be declared and paid or credited to its savings account holders from sources available for payment of earnings. The incorporators and others, before a certificate of incorporation is issued, shall deposit to the credit of the chairman of the incorporators in cash the amount of the expense fund. The amounts contributed to the expense fund by the incorporators and others shall not constitute a liability of the association except as hereinafter provided.

Contributions made by the incorporators and others to the expense fund may be repaid pro rata to the contributors from the net income of the association after provision for statutory reserves and declaration of earnings of not less than the contract or prevailing rate whichever may be applicable. In case of the liquidation of an association before contributions to the expense fund have been repaid, any contributions to the expense fund remaining unexpended, after the payment of expenses of liquidation, all creditors, and the withdrawal value of all savings accounts, shall be repaid to the contributors pro rata. The books of the association shall reflect the expense fund. Contributors to the expense fund shall, at the times earnings regularly are distributed to savings account holders, be paid earnings on the amounts paid in by them and remaining unreimbursed, and for such purpose such contributions shall be considered as savings accounts of the association.

Within thirty (30) days after the corporate existence of an association begins, the directors of the association shall hold an organization meeting and shall elect officers pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the bylaws. At the organization meeting the directors shall take such other action as is appropriate in connection with beginning the transaction of business by the association. The commissioner may extend by order the time within which the organization meeting shall be held for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 7; reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 18; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 19; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 19; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 51; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-37.
Capital stock association; minimum required capital; paid-in surplus; determining and maintaining adequate net worth.

A capital stock association shall be organized in accordance with this section. The incorporators shall appoint one (1) of their number as chairman of the incorporators. The capital of a capital stock association shall be the sum of the par value of all shares of voting capital stock. The minimum required capital shall be: (a) in municipalities having not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) inhabitants, the minimum sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00); (b) in municipalities having more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), but not more than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants, the minimum sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); (c) in municipalities having more than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants, the minimum sum of One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00). The population of the municipality shall be determined by the commissioner based upon the latest federal census. No commissions, fees or other remuneration shall be paid for the sale of shares of capital stock necessary to meet the minimum capital and paid-in surplus requirements of this section. No incentive stock shall be issued. All stock shall be sold at not less than par value.

In addition to the minimum capital required above, the subscribers shall pay an additional amount equal to not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the par value of the stock subscribed, which shall be credited to paid-in surplus and may be used to offset losses from operations. Such minimum capital and surplus may be used for the reserves required by law as may be permitted by the board.

After organization or conversion, each capital stock association shall maintain an adequate net worth appropriate for the conduct of its business and the protection of its savings account holders. The net worth adequacy of a capital stock association shall be determined by the commissioner on a regular basis but not less than one (1) time per year after evaluating the character of management, the liquidity or quality of assets, history of earnings and the retention thereof, the potential volatility of the deposit structure, and the association’s capacity to furnish the broadest service to the public. A written report of such finding and determination shall be made and filed. Such report shall include actions recommended to be taken. A copy of such report shall be sent to each member of the board and considered by the board at its next meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 45, § 8(1); Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 19; 426, § 1; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 20; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 52; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2001.